hunspell/kw_GB-SWF.dic
a-woles/Fp po:PREPOSITION
ambri/AfMaMlPs po:NOUN_FEMININE
araderor/AfMaMlPq po:NOUN_MASCULINE
awen/AfDiMaMl po:NOUN_FEMININE
awennow/AfDiMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
bargennyow-moon/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
bleydh/AfMaMlPe po:NOUN_MASCULINE
boubednow/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
brag/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_MASCULINE
bresel/MaMhMlMmViVr po:VERB_STEM
brest/AfMaMlPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
byld/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
byltt/MaMhMlMmVz po:VERB_STEM
choklet/AfMaMlPs po:NOUN_MASCULINE
darbarer/AfMaMlPq po:NOUN_MASCULINE
darsewya/MaMhMlMm po:VERB
dashwithrr/MaMhMlMmVs po:VERB_STEM
daskelw/MaMhMlMmViVrVs po:VERB_STEM
dasson/AfMaMlPx po:NOUN_MASCULINE
deg/MaMhMlMmViVr po:VERB_STEM
dewann/MaMhMlMmVt po:VERB_STEM
diank/MaMhMlMm po:VERB
didhan/MaMhMlMmVaVv po:VERB_STEM
diel/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
difystt/MaMhMlMmVu po:VERB_STEM
dirusk/MaMhMlMmVaVr po:VERB_STEM
diwla/AfDiMaMlPx po:NOUN_PLURAL
dogn/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
don/MaMhMlMmViVr po:VERB_STEM
dornell/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_FEMININE
downrew/MaMhMlMmViVrVs po:VERB_STEM
dragon/AfMaMlPe po:NOUN_FEMININE
driff/MaMhMlMmVz po:VERB_STEM
droghendl/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
dryft/AfMaMlPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
dyth/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
dyworth/Fp po:PREPOSITION
elidnyow/AfDeMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
elin/AfDeMaMl po:NOUN_MASCULINE
elinnyow/AfDeMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
enesekk/MaMhMlMmVs po:VERB_STEM
enow/MaMhMlMmViVrVs po:VERB_STEM
epskobeth/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_FEMININE
er/AfDeMaMlPxPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
fouton/AfMaMlPx po:NOUN_MASCULINE
garmm/MaMhMlMmVt po:VERB_STEM
garnisyon/AfMaMlPs po:NOUN_MASCULINE
godhvedhydh/MaMhMlMm po:VERB
gorbyss/MaMhMlMmVu po:VERB_STEM
goreser/AfMaMlPq po:NOUN_MASCULINE
gorvodrebedh/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
gostll/MaMhMlMmVs po:VERB_STEM
govell/MaMhMlMmVz po:VERB_STEM
goyen/MaMhMlMm po:VERB
grass/MaMhMlMmVaVtVv po:VERB_STEM
gress/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
gryll/AfMaMlPe po:NOUN_MASCULINE
gwernis/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
gwig/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_FEMININE
gwisk/MaMhMlMmVaVr po:VERB_STEM
hedh/MaMhMlMmViVr po:VERB_STEM
hweghmis/AfMaMlPx po:NOUN_MASCULINE
hyg/MaMhMlMmVaVr po:VERB_STEM
istitll/MaMhMlMmVs po:VERB_STEM
jakk/MaMhMlMmVt po:VERB_STEM
jykk/MaMhMlMmVu po:VERB_STEM
kach/MaMhMlMmVaVv po:VERB_STEM
kanari/AfMaMlPs po:NOUN_MASCULINE
kargher/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
kasorek/MhMl po:ADJECTIVE
keffres/Fp po:ADVERB
ken/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
kerv/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
kesstriver/AfMaMlPq po:NOUN_MASCULINE
kesunses/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_MASCULINE
kildennow/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
kloud/AfMaMlPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
kofh/MaMhMlMmVaViVr po:VERB_STEM
komner/AfMaMlPs po:NOUN_MASCULINE
konceff/MaMhMlMmVz po:VERB_STEM
koncev/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
koyntys/AfMaMlPx po:NOUN_FEMININE
krambl/MaMhMlMmVaVv po:VERB_STEM
krembl/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
kritik/MaMhMlMmVaVr po:VERB_STEM
lagas/AfDeMaMlPw po:NOUN_MASCULINE
lagatt/MaMhMlMmVaVtVv po:VERB_STEM
lesrydnn/MaMhMlMmVu po:VERB_STEM
leuv/AfDiMaMlPx po:NOUN_FEMININE
lewpard/AfMaMlPe po:NOUN_MASCULINE
lonn/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_MASCULINE
mewl/AfMaMl po:NOUN_MASCULINE
mildir/AfMaMlPx po:NOUN_MASCULINE
moghh/MaMhMlMmVaViVr po:VERB_STEM
motorydh/AfMaMlPq po:NOUN_MASCULINE
mykk/MaMhMlMmVu po:VERB_STEM
nath/AfMaMlPe po:NOUN_MASCULINE
neggh/MaMhMlMmVs po:VERB_STEM
nosweyth/Fp po:ADVERB
ojyon/AfMaMl po:NOUN_MASCULINE
organ/AfMaMlPsPw po:NOUN_MASCULINE
palawek/MhMl po:ADJECTIVE
parson/AfMaMlPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
pensyonydhes/AfMaMlPw po:NOUN_FEMININE
peryllow/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
playn/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
predheg/MaMhMlMmViVr po:VERB_STEM
preferr/MaMhMlMmVz po:VERB_STEM
presum/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
ragwir/AfMaMlPx po:NOUN_MASCULINE
reyn/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
robbyer/AfMaMlPq po:NOUN_MASCULINE
shack/MaMhMlMmVaVv po:VERB_STEM
sheck/MaMhMlMmVw po:VERB_STEM
sheft/AfMaMlPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
skapp/MaMhMlMmVt po:VERB_STEM
skovarn/AfDiMaMl po:NOUN_FEMININE
skovornow/AfDiMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
skrifwesyon/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
skypp/MaMhMlMmVaVuVyVz po:VERB_STEM
sonskrif/MaMhMlMmVaVr po:VERB_STEM
spencer/AfMaMlPs po:NOUN_MASCULINE
spenn/MaMhMlMmVs po:VERB_STEM
talgamm/MaMhMlMmVaVtVv po:VERB_STEM
tanjerin/AfMaMlPe po:NOUN_MASCULINE
teg/Fp po:ADVERB
teknegydhyon/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
ufern/AfDeMaMlPx po:NOUN_MASCULINE
walts/AfMaMlPy po:NOUN_MASCULINE
waltss/MaMhMlMmVt po:VERB_STEM
waltsya/MaMhMlMm po:VERB
yn-mysk/Fp po:PREPOSITION
ynklin/MaMhMlMmVaVy po:VERB_STEM
yogortys/AfMaMl po:NOUN_PLURAL
